Massachusetts, session 194th, H2428.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 12N of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out section 12N, as amended by section 
12N of chapter 263 of the Acts of 2020, and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 12N. Protecting women’s health 
Notwithstanding section 12L, for the purpose of preventing maternal death from abortion 
or miscarriage as pregnancy progresses, no physician may perform or induce, or attempt to 
perform or induce an abortion or cause a miscarriage on any female in a stage of pregnancy after 
the second trimester unless the following conditions are met: (a) the procedure is performed in a 
hospital and (b) the physician and two consulting physicians certify, and so enter in the hospital 

of 2 10 record of the female, that in their medical opinion, based upon their best clinical judgment, the 
continuation of the pregnancy is likely to result in the death of the female. Nothing in this section 
shall prevent the medically necessary procedures to care for the mother after a miscarriage 
occurring before 20 weeks or a stillbirth or fetal death occurring after 20 weeks. 
SECTION 2. Section 12O of Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 
2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out section 12O, as amended by section 
12O of chapter 263 of the Acts of 2020, and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 12O. Preserving the life of a fetus born alive after miscarriage or abortion 
Notwithstanding section 12L, if an abortion is performed or an intentional miscarriage is 
caused pursuant to section 12N, the hospital where the procedure is performed shall provide all 
life-saving measures and equipment, as defined by the department of public health, and the 
physician performing the abortion or causing the miscarriage shall employ all the life-saving 
measures and equipment to preserve the life and health of the fetus born alive if it exhibits any 
clearly visible, audible, or otherwise discernable evidence of viability.